Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Livestock Sellers Protective Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Agriculture;

(2) Slaughter livestock shall mean cattle, sheep, and swine produced or fed in this state and destined for immediate slaughter;

(3) Purchaser shall mean any person, firm, corporation, or association engaged in the purchase of slaughter livestock in excess of five hundred animal units per year based upon two hundred sixty slaughtering days;

(4) Animal unit shall consist of one head of cattle, or three calves, under four hundred fifty pounds, or five hogs, or ten sheep or lambs;

(5) Insolvent shall mean that a person either has ceased to pay his or her debts in the ordinary course of business or cannot pay his or her debts as they become due or is insolvent within the meaning of the Federal Bankruptcy Act;

(6) Person shall include individuals, firms, associations, limited liability companies, or corporations or employees, officers, or limited liability company members thereof; and

(7) Purchase of livestock for slaughter shall mean the purchase of livestock for immediate use in manufacturing or preparing meat or meat food products.

Laws 1969, c. 448, § 2, p. 1499;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 72.